Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
706

DISPOSITION
OF CONVICTED DEFENDANTS

Part I. Pre-Sentence Investigation and
Report,

Authorized Disposition, and
Classes of

Felonies

Section

706-600 Sentence in accordance with this chapter

706-600.5 Definitions of terms in this chapter

706-600.6 Time of release

706-601 Pre-sentence diagnosis and report

706-602 Pre-sentence diagnosis, notice to
victims, and

report

706-603 DNA analysis monetary assessment; DNA
registry

special fund

706-604 Opportunity to be heard with respect to
sentence;

notice of pre-sentence report;
opportunity to

controvert or supplement; transmission
of report to

department

706-605 Authorized disposition of convicted
defendants

706-605.1 Intermediate sanctions; eligibility;
criteria and

conditions

706-605.5 Program of regimental discipline

706-606 Factors to be considered in imposing a
sentence

706-606.1 Repealed

706-606.2 Special sentencing considerations for
arson;

other actions not prohibited

706-606.3 Expedited sentencing program

706-606.4 Sentencing in offenses involving abuse
of a family

or household member committed in the
presence of a

minor

706-606.5 Sentencing of repeat offenders

706-606.6 Repeat violent and sexual offender;
enhanced

sentence

706-607 Civil commitment in lieu of prosecution
or of

sentence

706-608 Penalties against corporations and
unincorporated

associations; forfeiture of corporate
charter or

revocation of certificate authorizing
foreign

corporation to do business in the State

706-609 Resentence for the same offense or for
offense based

on the same conduct not to be more
severe than prior

sentence

706-610 Classes of felonies

Part II. Probation

706-620 Authority to withhold sentence of
imprisonment

706-621 Factors to be considered in imposing a
term of

probation

706-622 Requirement of probation; exception

706-622.5 Sentencing for drug offenders;
expungement

706-622.8 First-time drug offender prior to 2004;
probation;

expungement

706-622.9 Sentencing for first-time property
offenders;

expungement

706-623 Terms of probation

706-624 Conditions of probation

706-624.5 Notice of probation

706-625 Revocation, modification of probation
conditions

706-626 Summons or arrest of defendant on
probation;

commitment without bail

706-627 Tolling of probation

706-628 Repealed

706-629 Calculation of multiple dispositions
involving

probation and imprisonment, or multiple
terms of

probation

706-630 Discharge of defendant

706-631 Probation is a final judgment for other
purposes

Part III. Fees, Fines, and Restitution

706-640 Authorized fines

706-641 Criteria for imposing fines

706-642 Time and method of payment

706-643 Disposition of funds

706-644 Consequences of nonpayment; imprisonment
for

contumacious nonpayment; summary
collection

706-645 Revocation of fine or restitution

706-646 Victim restitution

706-647 Civil enforcement

706-648 Probation services fee

706-649 Probation services special fund

706-650 Drug demand reduction assessments;
special fund

706-650.5 Human trafficking victim services fund

Part IV. Imprisonment

706-656 Terms of imprisonment for first and
second degree

murder and attempted first and second
degree murder

706-657 Enhanced sentence for second degree
murder

706-659 Sentence of imprisonment for class A
felony

706-660 Sentence of imprisonment for class B and
C felonies;

ordinary terms; discretionary terms

706-660.1 Sentence of imprisonment for use of a
firearm,

semiautomatic firearm, or automatic
firearm in a

felony

706-660.2 Sentence of imprisonment for offenses
against

children, elder persons, or handicapped
persons

706-661 Extended terms of imprisonment

706-662 Criteria for extended terms of
imprisonment

706-663 Sentence of imprisonment for misdemeanor
and petty

misdemeanor

706-664 Procedure for imposing extended terms of

imprisonment

706-665 Former conviction in another
jurisdiction

706-666 Definition of proof of conviction

706-667 Young adult defendants

706-668 Repealed

706-668.5 Multiple sentence of imprisonment

706-669 Procedure for determining minimum term
of

imprisonment

706-670 Parole procedure; release on parole;
terms of

parole, recommitment, and reparole;
final

unconditional release

706-670.5 Notice of parole or final unconditional
release

706-671 Credit for time of detention prior to
sentence;

credit for imprisonment under earlier
sentence for

same crime

706-672 Place of imprisonment

706-673 Notice of escape

Cross References

Corrections population management commission, see chapter
353F.

Overdose prevention; limited immunity, see §329-43.6.

COMMENTARY ON CHAPTER 706

Act 314, Session Laws 1986, amended this chapter to reflect a
shift from the present policy underlying sentencing, which emphasizes
rehabilitation, to one intended to achieve the goal of just punishment.
Conference Committee Report No. 51-86.

Case Notes

Neither this chapter nor chapter 353 prohibits the Hawaii
paroling authority from setting a prisoner's minimum term at a period equal to
his or her maximum sentence. 97 H. 183, 35 P.3d 210 (2001).

Chapter not violated and pre-sentence report sufficiently
complied with §706-602, where defendant asserted that court did not order or
receive a pre-sentence correctional diagnosis and report as required by
§706-601(1)(a), therefore, since the information required under §706-602 was
not furnished to court for its consideration in imposing sentence, the
sentences were not imposed in accordance with provisions of this chapter and
were illegal. 10 H. App. 535, 880 P.2d 208 (1992).

Criminal contempt of court under §710-1077 is not available
as a sanction for a violation of a condition of probation as there is no provision
in this chapter that authorizes the use of criminal contempt as a sanction for
violation of a condition of probation; the exclusive sanctions for a violation
of a condition of probation in this chapter are set forth in §706-625. 120 H.
312 (App.), 205 P.3d 577 (2009).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next